New Jersey, session 221, A783.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2A:15-10 is amended to read as follows: 2A:15-10.   a.   If plaintiff in an action as to which a notice of lis pendens has been filed as herein required fails to prosecute the same diligently, the court wherein the action is pending may, for such cause or for other good cause shown, by order direct the county clerk or register of deeds and mortgages, as the case may be, to discharge the lis pendens of record. b.    After the passage of at least six months following the discharge of a notice of lis pendens pursuant to this section, due to the plaintiffs failure to prosecute, or pursuant to N.J.S.2A:15-7, due to the plaintiffs failure to establish there was a probability that final judgment would be entered in favor of the plaintiff sufficient to justify the notice, if plaintiff has failed to diligently prosecute the action for which the notice was previously discharged, the defendant may file a motion with the court to have the action dismissed with prejudice, which the court may order for such cause or for other good cause shown. (cf: N.J.S.2A:15-10) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and apply to any action filed on or after that date, as well as any action filed prior to that date which has not yet been finally adjudicated.